Maryland, session 2025, SB0769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–606.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY
PROVISION EXPANSION PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION EXPANSION
PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(D) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING IN
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0769*

SENATE BILL 769
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO ELIGIBLE SCHOOLS
THAT PARTICIPATE IN THE FEDERAL COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION OF THE
CHILD NUTRITION PROGRAMS.
(2) THE STATE SHALL PAY THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE
APPLICABLE FEDERAL PAID REIMBURSEMENT RATE AND THE FEDERAL FREE
REIMBURSEMENT RATE, AS SET ANNUALLY BY THE U.S. SECRETARY OF
AGRICULTURE UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1759A.
(3) THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER THE PROGRAM IS INTENDED TO
COMPLEMENT AND NOT REPLACE FEDERAL FUNDS RECEIVED UNDER THE
COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION OF THE CHILD NUTRITION PROGRAMS.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A PROCESS FOR COUNTY BOARDS TO PARTICIPATE IN
THE PROGRAM BASED ON FUNDING AVAILABILITY;
(2) ENSURE THAT PROGRAM FUNDING IS DISTRIBUTED BASED ON
THE CONCENTRATION OF POVERTY IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS WITHIN THE JURISDICTION
OF THE COUNTY BOARD;
(3) CONSIDER GEOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY IN DETERMINING FUNDING
PRIORITIZATION; AND
(4) DISTRIBUTE FUNDS TO ELIGIBLE COUNTY BOARDS.
(F) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE AN APPROPRIATION OF $10,000,000 IN THE ANNUAL
BUDGET BILL FOR THE PROGRAM.
(G) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE STATE, EACH
COUNTY BOARD, AND PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS MAXIMIZE THE USE OF
ALL AVAILABLE FEDERAL AND STATE FUNDS IN CARRYING OUT THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THE PROGRAM.
(H) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS AND OUTCOME OF
THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.